src/srseng/resources/fst/eng2srs.lexc
< [ h o l d %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ h o l d %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ h o l d %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  l i f t %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  l i f t %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  l i f t s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  l i f t %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  l i f t %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  l i f t %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  u p %  c l o t h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  l i f t s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  c l o t h ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ p u t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  p u t %  i t %  u p %  o n %  s o m e t h i n g [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  l i f t %  [ p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  h o l d %  u p %  a g a i n %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ l i f t | p i c k | h o l d ] %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l o s e %  a g a i n %  r o u n d %  A S S E R T I V E "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] [ 0 | %  A S S E R T I V E ] %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  [ l i f t e d | p i c k e d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
< [ l i f t %  p i c k %  u p %  r o u n d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  [ l i f t e d | p i c k e d ] %  i t %  u p [ 0 | %  r o u n d ] ] > # ;
